New York, session 2025-2026, S1731.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 19.07 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (o) to read as follows: 3 (o) The office shall administer a scholarship program to be named the 4 "NYS Father Peter Young Memorial Addiction Professionals Scholarship 5 Program". Such program shall offer financial education assistance to 6 individuals pursuing a bachelor's degree in addiction studies or the 7 education requirements for an office of addiction services and supports 8 credential at Alfred State College, Stony Brook University or Empire 9 State University. Such program shall use such funds as shall be provided 10 by the governor for the purposes under this subdivision. The commission- 11 er shall be authorized to seek and receive any assistance deemed neces- 12 sary by the commissioner from the University of the State of New York in 13 the administration of such program. Such program shall operate as a 14 continuation of any program operating under the leadership of the office 15 for the same purpose in existence upon the effective date of this subdi- 16 vision. The commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate any rules 17 and/or regulations necessary for the implementation of this subdivision. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 20 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 21 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 22 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04763-01-5